Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5936.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 11-47 of the General Laws entitled "Weapons" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
11-47-8.2. Review and appeal of the decision of the licensing authority or attorney
general.
(a) A decision denying a permit pursuant to either §§ 11-47-11 or 11-47-18 shall be final
unless further review or appeal is initiated in writing within fifteen (15) days after the decision has
been mailed to the applicant at the address listed on the application.
(b) An aggrieved individual may submit a written request to reconsider the denial to the
licensing authority or the department of the attorney general. Said request shall be submitted within
fifteen (15) days after the decision has been mailed to the address provided by the applicant.
(1) The licensing authority or the department of the attorney general shall schedule and
conduct an in-person meeting within fourteen (14) days of the request to review and discuss the
decision. Said meeting shall only be scheduled or rescheduled beyond the initial fourteen (14) day
period by agreement of the parties or for good cause, but in no event exceed sixty (60) days.
(2) The applicant may submit any supplemental documentation relative to the application,
which shall become part of the application.
(3) The meeting shall be conducted as an informal meeting, not as an administrative
hearing. The licensing authority or the department of the attorney general shall receive and consider
documents and other evidence without regard to statutory and common law rules. A stenographic

record, transcription, video, audio or other recording is only allowed by agreement of the parties.
(4) The applicant may be represented at this meeting by an attorney.
(5) The licensing authority or the department of the attorney general shall, within seven (7)
days after the meeting, mail a decision to the applicant granting or denying the application. Any
denial shall be in writing and state with specificity the reason(s) and evidence upon which the denial
was based and the rationale for the denial.
(c) An aggrieved individual may submit an appeal of the decision denying a permit
pursuant to either §§ 11-47-11 or 11-47-18 or of the decision of the request to reconsider to the
superior court for the county in which the licensing authority or attorney general is located, in the
form of a miscellaneous petition, within fifteen (15) days after the decision has been mailed to the
applicant at the address listed on the application.
(1) The petition for review shall state the grounds upon which review is sought but need
not be verified.
(2) Upon appeal, the petitioner is entitled to a trial de novo before a justice of the superior
court without a jury.
(3) Within thirty (30) days of the notice of appeal the licensing authority or attorney general
shall provide a full, complete and certified copy of the application and all submitted documents to
both the petitioner and the superior court.
(d) Pursuant to chapter 3 of title 38, the request to reconsider and the appeal to the superior
court, shall not be deemed public. All documents, records and proceedings before the licensing
authority, the department of the attorney general and the superior court shall not be open to the
public, but may be accessed by law enforcement personnel to be used for law enforcement purposes
only and shall otherwise remain otherwise confidential.
(e) An applicant may have the superior court hearing open to the public upon written
request to the superior court.
(f) The superior court may award reasonable attorneys' fees, costs and filing fees to the
prevailing applicant if the court finds that there is no justiciable issue of either law of fact, or if the
licensing authority or the department of the attorney general did not have a good faith basis in the
denial of the license or permit.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001750
========
LC001750 - Page 2 of 3